North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-18 Uniform Status of Children of Assisted Conception Act

14-18-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Assisted conception” means a pregnancy resulting from insemination of an egg of a woman with sperm of a man by means other than sexual intercourse or by removal and implantation of an embryo after sexual intercourse but does not include a pregnancy resulting from the insemination of an egg of a wife using her husband’s sperm.

“Gestational carrier” means an adult woman who enters into an agreement to have an embryo implanted in her and bear the resulting child for intended parents, where the embryo is conceived by using the egg and sperm of the intended parents.

“Surrogate” means an adult woman who enters into an agreement to bear a child conceived through assisted conception for intended parents.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 184, § 1; 1995, ch. 158, § 1; 2005, ch. 135, § 5.

Cross-References.

For crime of child procurement, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-31-05.

Collateral References.

Coverage of artificial insemination procedures or other infertility treatments by health, sickness, or hospitalization insurance, 80 A.L.R.4th 1059.

Determination of status as legal or natural parents in contested surrogacy births, 77 A.L.R.5th 567.

Comparative Legislation.

Jurisdictions which have enacted the Uniform Status of Children of Assisted Conception Act include:

Va. Code §§ 20-156 to 20-165.

14-18-02.
Maternity. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 158, § 3.

14-18-02.1.
Paternity. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 11.

14-18-03.
Assisted conception by married woman. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 11.

14-18-04.
Parental status of donors and deceased persons. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 11.

14-18-05.
Surrogate agreements.

Any agreement in which a woman agrees to become a surrogate or to relinquish that woman’s rights and duties as parent of a child conceived through assisted conception is void. The surrogate, however, is the mother of a resulting child and the surrogate’s husband, if a party to the agreement, is the father of the child. If the surrogate’s husband is not a party to the agreement or the surrogate is unmarried, paternity of the child is governed by chapter 14-20.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 184, § 5; 2005, ch. 135, § 6.

Collateral References.

Determination of status as legal or natural parents in contested surrogacy births, 77 A.L.R.5th 567.

14-18-06.
Relation of parent and child. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 11.

14-18-07.
Succession and gift rights. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 11.

14-18-08.
Gestational carrier agreements.

A child born to a gestational carrier is a child of the intended parents for all purposes and is not a child of the gestational carrier and the gestational carrier’s husband, if any.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 7.

14-18-09.
Responsibility of intended parents for pregnancy-related costs.

The costs of pregnancy-related services, including labor and delivery services, incurred by a surrogate or gestational carrier as defined by section 14-18-01 are the responsibility of the intended parents.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 128, § 1.